test/src/gt-norm-yamls/P-simplex_kene_gt-norm.yaml
     nihuke+Pron+Sg+Ess: nihukesena
     nihuke+Pron+Sg+Abe: nihukeseta
     nihuke+Pron+Sg+Com: nihukesega
     nihuke+Pron+Pl+Nom: nihukesed
     nihuke+Pron+Pl+Gen: nihukeste
     nihuke+Pron+Pl+Par: nihukesi
     nihuke+Pron+Pl+Ill: [nihukestesse, nihukesisse]
     nihuke+Pron+Pl+Ine: [nihukestes, nihukesis]
     nihuke+Pron+Pl+Ela: [nihukestest, nihukesist]
     nihuke+Pron+Pl+All: [nihukestele, nihukesile]
     nihuke+Pron+Pl+Ade: [nihukestel, nihukesil]
     nihuke+Pron+Pl+Abl: [nihukestelt, nihukesilt]
     nihuke+Pron+Pl+Tra: [nihukesteks, nihukesiks]
     nihuke+Pron+Pl+Trm: nihukesteni
     nihuke+Pron+Pl+Ess: nihukestena
     nihuke+Pron+Pl+Abe: nihukesteta
     nihuke+Pron+Pl+Com: nihukestega
     #
     nihukene+Pron+Sg+Nom: nihukene
     nihukene+Pron+Sg+Gen: nihukese
     nihukene+Pron+Sg+Par: nihukest
     nihukene+Pron+Sg+Ill: [nihukesesse, nihukesse]
     nihukene+Pron+Sg+Ine: nihukeses
     nihukene+Pron+Sg+Ela: nihukesest
     nihukene+Pron+Sg+All: nihukesele
     nihukene+Pron+Sg+Ade: nihukesel
     nihukene+Pron+Sg+Abl: nihukeselt
     nihukene+Pron+Sg+Tra: nihukeseks
     nihukene+Pron+Sg+Trm: nihukeseni
     nihukene+Pron+Sg+Ess: nihukesena
     nihukene+Pron+Sg+Abe: nihukeseta
     nihukene+Pron+Sg+Com: nihukesega
     nihukene+Pron+Pl+Nom: nihukesed
     nihukene+Pron+Pl+Gen: nihukeste
     nihukene+Pron+Pl+Par: nihukesi
     nihukene+Pron+Pl+Ill: [nihukestesse, nihukesisse]
     nihukene+Pron+Pl+Ine: [nihukestes, nihukesis]
     nihukene+Pron+Pl+Ela: [nihukestest, nihukesist]
     nihukene+Pron+Pl+All: [nihukestele, nihukesile]
     nihukene+Pron+Pl+Ade: [nihukestel, nihukesil]
     nihukene+Pron+Pl+Abl: [nihukestelt, nihukesilt]
     nihukene+Pron+Pl+Tra: [nihukesteks, nihukesiks]
     nihukene+Pron+Pl+Trm: nihukesteni
     nihukene+Pron+Pl+Ess: nihukestena
     nihukene+Pron+Pl+Abe: nihukesteta
     nihukene+Pron+Pl+Com: nihukestega
     #
     nisuke+Pron+Sg+Nom: nisuke
     nisuke+Pron+Sg+Gen: nisukese
     nisuke+Pron+Sg+Par: nisukest
     nisuke+Pron+Sg+Ill: [nisukesesse, nisukesse]
     nisuke+Pron+Sg+Ine: nisukeses
     nisuke+Pron+Sg+Ela: nisukesest
     nisuke+Pron+Sg+All: nisukesele
     nisuke+Pron+Sg+Ade: nisukesel
     nisuke+Pron+Sg+Abl: nisukeselt
     nisuke+Pron+Sg+Tra: nisukeseks
     nisuke+Pron+Sg+Trm: nisukeseni
     nisuke+Pron+Sg+Ess: nisukesena
     nisuke+Pron+Sg+Abe: nisukeseta
     nisuke+Pron+Sg+Com: nisukesega
     nisuke+Pron+Pl+Nom: nisukesed
     nisuke+Pron+Pl+Gen: nisukeste
     nisuke+Pron+Pl+Par: nisukesi
     nisuke+Pron+Pl+Ill: [nisukestesse, nisukesisse]
     nisuke+Pron+Pl+Ine: [nisukestes, nisukesis]
     nisuke+Pron+Pl+Ela: [nisukestest, nisukesist]
     nisuke+Pron+Pl+All: [nisukestele, nisukesile]
     nisuke+Pron+Pl+Ade: [nisukestel, nisukesil]
     nisuke+Pron+Pl+Abl: [nisukestelt, nisukesilt]
     nisuke+Pron+Pl+Tra: [nisukesteks, nisukesiks]
     nisuke+Pron+Pl+Trm: nisukesteni
     nisuke+Pron+Pl+Ess: nisukestena
     nisuke+Pron+Pl+Abe: nisukesteta
     nisuke+Pron+Pl+Com: nisukestega
     #
     nisukene+Pron+Sg+Nom: nisukene
     nisukene+Pron+Sg+Gen: nisukese
     nisukene+Pron+Sg+Par: nisukest
     nisukene+Pron+Sg+Ill: [nisukesesse, nisukesse]
     nisukene+Pron+Sg+Ine: nisukeses
     nisukene+Pron+Sg+Ela: nisukesest
     nisukene+Pron+Sg+All: nisukesele
     nisukene+Pron+Sg+Ade: nisukesel
     nisukene+Pron+Sg+Abl: nisukeselt
     nisukene+Pron+Sg+Tra: nisukeseks
     nisukene+Pron+Sg+Trm: nisukeseni
     nisukene+Pron+Sg+Ess: nisukesena
     nisukene+Pron+Sg+Abe: nisukeseta
     nisukene+Pron+Sg+Com: nisukesega
     nisukene+Pron+Pl+Nom: nisukesed
     nisukene+Pron+Pl+Gen: nisukeste
     nisukene+Pron+Pl+Par: nisukesi
     nisukene+Pron+Pl+Ill: [nisukestesse, nisukesisse]
     nisukene+Pron+Pl+Ine: [nisukestes, nisukesis]
     nisukene+Pron+Pl+Ela: [nisukestest, nisukesist]
     nisukene+Pron+Pl+All: [nisukestele, nisukesile]
     nisukene+Pron+Pl+Ade: [nisukestel, nisukesil]
     nisukene+Pron+Pl+Abl: [nisukestelt, nisukesilt]
     nisukene+Pron+Pl+Tra: [nisukesteks, nisukesiks]
     nisukene+Pron+Pl+Trm: nisukesteni
     nisukene+Pron+Pl+Ess: nisukestena
     nisukene+Pron+Pl+Abe: nisukesteta
     nisukene+Pron+Pl+Com: nisukestega
     #
     paljuke+Pron+Sg+Nom: paljuke
     paljuke+Pron+Sg+Gen: paljukese
     paljuke+Pron+Sg+Par: paljukest
     paljuke+Pron+Sg+Ill: [paljukesesse, paljukesse]
     paljuke+Pron+Sg+Ine: paljukeses
     paljuke+Pron+Sg+Ela: paljukesest
     paljuke+Pron+Sg+All: paljukesele
     paljuke+Pron+Sg+Ade: paljukesel
     paljuke+Pron+Sg+Abl: paljukeselt
     paljuke+Pron+Sg+Tra: paljukeseks
     paljuke+Pron+Sg+Trm: paljukeseni
     paljuke+Pron+Sg+Ess: paljukesena
     paljuke+Pron+Sg+Abe: paljukeseta
     paljuke+Pron+Sg+Com: paljukesega
     paljuke+Pron+Pl+Nom: paljukesed
     paljuke+Pron+Pl+Gen: paljukeste
     paljuke+Pron+Pl+Par: paljukesi
     paljuke+Pron+Pl+Ill: [paljukestesse, paljukesisse]
     paljuke+Pron+Pl+Ine: [paljukestes, paljukesis]
     paljuke+Pron+Pl+Ela: [paljukestest, paljukesist]
     paljuke+Pron+Pl+All: [paljukestele, paljukesile]
     paljuke+Pron+Pl+Ade: [paljukestel, paljukesil]
     paljuke+Pron+Pl+Abl: [paljukestelt, paljukesilt]
     paljuke+Pron+Pl+Tra: [paljukesteks, paljukesiks]
     paljuke+Pron+Pl+Trm: paljukesteni
     paljuke+Pron+Pl+Ess: paljukestena
     paljuke+Pron+Pl+Abe: paljukesteta
     paljuke+Pron+Pl+Com: paljukestega
     #
     selline+Pron+Sg+Nom: selline
     selline+Pron+Sg+Gen: sellise
     selline+Pron+Sg+Par: sellist
     selline+Pron+Sg+Ill: sellisesse
     selline+Pron+Sg+Ine: sellises
     selline+Pron+Sg+Ela: sellisest
     selline+Pron+Sg+All: sellisele
     selline+Pron+Sg+Ade: sellisel
     selline+Pron+Sg+Abl: selliselt
     selline+Pron+Sg+Tra: selliseks
     selline+Pron+Sg+Trm: selliseni
     selline+Pron+Sg+Ess: sellisena
     selline+Pron+Sg+Abe: selliseta
     selline+Pron+Sg+Com: sellisega
     selline+Pron+Pl+Nom: sellised
     selline+Pron+Pl+Gen: selliste
     selline+Pron+Pl+Par: selliseid
     selline+Pron+Pl+Ill: [sellistesse, selliseisse]
     selline+Pron+Pl+Ine: [sellistes, selliseis]
     selline+Pron+Pl+Ela: [sellistest, selliseist]
     selline+Pron+Pl+All: [sellistele, selliseile]
     selline+Pron+Pl+Ade: [sellistel, selliseil]
     selline+Pron+Pl+Abl: [sellistelt, selliseilt]
     selline+Pron+Pl+Tra: [sellisteks, selliseiks]
     selline+Pron+Pl+Trm: sellisteni
     selline+Pron+Pl+Ess: sellistena
     selline+Pron+Pl+Abe: sellisteta
     selline+Pron+Pl+Com: sellistega
     #
     sihuke+Pron+Sg+Nom: sihuke
     sihuke+Pron+Sg+Gen: sihukese
     sihuke+Pron+Sg+Par: sihukest
     sihuke+Pron+Sg+Ill: [sihukesesse, sihukesse]
     sihuke+Pron+Sg+Ine: sihukeses
     sihuke+Pron+Sg+Ela: sihukesest
     sihuke+Pron+Sg+All: sihukesele
     sihuke+Pron+Sg+Ade: sihukesel
     sihuke+Pron+Sg+Abl: sihukeselt
     sihuke+Pron+Sg+Tra: sihukeseks
     sihuke+Pron+Sg+Trm: sihukeseni
     sihuke+Pron+Sg+Ess: sihukesena
     sihuke+Pron+Sg+Abe: sihukeseta
     sihuke+Pron+Sg+Com: sihukesega
     sihuke+Pron+Pl+Nom: sihukesed
     sihuke+Pron+Pl+Gen: sihukeste
     sihuke+Pron+Pl+Par: sihukesi
     sihuke+Pron+Pl+Ill: [sihukestesse, sihukesisse]
     sihuke+Pron+Pl+Ine: [sihukestes, sihukesis]
     sihuke+Pron+Pl+Ela: [sihukestest, sihukesist]
     sihuke+Pron+Pl+All: [sihukestele, sihukesile]
     sihuke+Pron+Pl+Ade: [sihukestel, sihukesil]
     sihuke+Pron+Pl+Abl: [sihukestelt, sihukesilt]
     sihuke+Pron+Pl+Tra: [sihukesteks, sihukesiks]
     sihuke+Pron+Pl+Trm: sihukesteni
     sihuke+Pron+Pl+Ess: sihukestena
     sihuke+Pron+Pl+Abe: sihukesteta
     sihuke+Pron+Pl+Com: sihukestega
     #
     sihukene+Pron+Sg+Nom: sihukene
     sihukene+Pron+Sg+Gen: sihukese
     sihukene+Pron+Sg+Par: sihukest
     sihukene+Pron+Sg+Ill: [sihukesesse, sihukesse]
     sihukene+Pron+Sg+Ine: sihukeses
     sihukene+Pron+Sg+Ela: sihukesest
     sihukene+Pron+Sg+All: sihukesele
     sihukene+Pron+Sg+Ade: sihukesel
     sihukene+Pron+Sg+Abl: sihukeselt
     sihukene+Pron+Sg+Tra: sihukeseks
     sihukene+Pron+Sg+Trm: sihukeseni
     sihukene+Pron+Sg+Ess: sihukesena
     sihukene+Pron+Sg+Abe: sihukeseta
     sihukene+Pron+Sg+Com: sihukesega
     sihukene+Pron+Pl+Nom: sihukesed
     sihukene+Pron+Pl+Gen: sihukeste
     sihukene+Pron+Pl+Par: sihukesi
     sihukene+Pron+Pl+Ill: [sihukestesse, sihukesisse]
     sihukene+Pron+Pl+Ine: [sihukestes, sihukesis]
     sihukene+Pron+Pl+Ela: [sihukestest, sihukesist]
     sihukene+Pron+Pl+All: [sihukestele, sihukesile]
     sihukene+Pron+Pl+Ade: [sihukestel, sihukesil]
     sihukene+Pron+Pl+Abl: [sihukestelt, sihukesilt]
     sihukene+Pron+Pl+Tra: [sihukesteks, sihukesiks]
     sihukene+Pron+Pl+Trm: sihukesteni
     sihukene+Pron+Pl+Ess: sihukestena
     sihukene+Pron+Pl+Abe: sihukesteta
     sihukene+Pron+Pl+Com: sihukestega
     #
     säherdune+Pron+Sg+Nom: säherdune
     säherdune+Pron+Sg+Gen: säherduse
     säherdune+Pron+Sg+Par: säherdust
     säherdune+Pron+Sg+Ill: [säherdusesse, säherdusse]
     säherdune+Pron+Sg+Ine: säherduses
     säherdune+Pron+Sg+Ela: säherdusest
     säherdune+Pron+Sg+All: säherdusele
     säherdune+Pron+Sg+Ade: säherdusel
     säherdune+Pron+Sg+Abl: säherduselt
     säherdune+Pron+Sg+Tra: säherduseks
     säherdune+Pron+Sg+Trm: säherduseni
     säherdune+Pron+Sg+Ess: säherdusena
     säherdune+Pron+Sg+Abe: säherduseta
     säherdune+Pron+Sg+Com: säherdusega
     säherdune+Pron+Pl+Nom: säherdused
     säherdune+Pron+Pl+Gen: säherduste
     säherdune+Pron+Pl+Par: säherdusi
     säherdune+Pron+Pl+Ill: [säherdustesse, säherdusisse]
     säherdune+Pron+Pl+Ine: [säherdustes, säherdusis]
     säherdune+Pron+Pl+Ela: [säherdustest, säherdusist]
     säherdune+Pron+Pl+All: [säherdustele, säherdusile]
     säherdune+Pron+Pl+Ade: [säherdustel, säherdusil]
     säherdune+Pron+Pl+Abl: [säherdustelt, säherdusilt]
     säherdune+Pron+Pl+Tra: [säherdusteks, säherdusiks]
     säherdune+Pron+Pl+Trm: säherdusteni
     säherdune+Pron+Pl+Ess: säherdustena
     säherdune+Pron+Pl+Abe: säherdusteta
     säherdune+Pron+Pl+Com: säherdustega
     #
     säärane+Pron+Sg+Nom: säärane
     säärane+Pron+Sg+Gen: säärase
     säärane+Pron+Sg+Par: säärast
     säärane+Pron+Sg+Ill: säärasesse
     säärane+Pron+Sg+Ine: säärases
     säärane+Pron+Sg+Ela: säärasest
     säärane+Pron+Sg+All: säärasele
     säärane+Pron+Sg+Ade: säärasel
     säärane+Pron+Sg+Abl: sääraselt
     säärane+Pron+Sg+Tra: sääraseks
     säärane+Pron+Sg+Trm: sääraseni
     säärane+Pron+Sg+Ess: säärasena
     säärane+Pron+Sg+Abe: sääraseta
     säärane+Pron+Sg+Com: säärasega
     säärane+Pron+Pl+Nom: säärased
     säärane+Pron+Pl+Gen: sääraste
     säärane+Pron+Pl+Par: sääraseid
     säärane+Pron+Pl+Ill: [säärastesse, sääraseisse]
     säärane+Pron+Pl+Ine: [säärastes, sääraseis]
     säärane+Pron+Pl+Ela: [säärastest, sääraseist]
     säärane+Pron+Pl+All: [säärastele, sääraseile]
     säärane+Pron+Pl+Ade: [säärastel, sääraseil]
     säärane+Pron+Pl+Abl: [säärastelt, sääraseilt]
     säärane+Pron+Pl+Tra: [säärasteks, sääraseiks]
     säärane+Pron+Pl+Trm: säärasteni
     säärane+Pron+Pl+Ess: säärastena
     säärane+Pron+Pl+Abe: säärasteta
     säärane+Pron+Pl+Com: säärastega
     #
     taoline+Pron+Sg+Nom: taoline
     taoline+Pron+Sg+Gen: taolise
     taoline+Pron+Sg+Par: taolist
     taoline+Pron+Sg+Ill: [taolisesse, taolisse]
     taoline+Pron+Sg+Ine: taolises
     taoline+Pron+Sg+Ela: taolisest
     taoline+Pron+Sg+All: taolisele
     taoline+Pron+Sg+Ade: taolisel
     taoline+Pron+Sg+Abl: taoliselt
     taoline+Pron+Sg+Tra: taoliseks
     taoline+Pron+Sg+Trm: taoliseni
     taoline+Pron+Sg+Ess: taolisena
     taoline+Pron+Sg+Abe: taoliseta
     taoline+Pron+Sg+Com: taolisega
     taoline+Pron+Pl+Nom: taolised
     taoline+Pron+Pl+Gen: taoliste
     taoline+Pron+Pl+Par: [taoliseid, taolisi]
     taoline+Pron+Pl+Ill: [taolistesse, taolisisse]
     taoline+Pron+Pl+Ine: [taolistes, taolisis]
     taoline+Pron+Pl+Ela: [taolistest, taolisist]
     taoline+Pron+Pl+All: [taolistele, taolisile]
